Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-211.01
Licensee; license expired while serving in armed forces; reinstatement; requirements.

All licensees provided for in the Barber Act whose valid licenses have expired while serving in the armed forces of the United States may have such licenses reinstated without further examination upon their return from the armed forces and payment of the necessary fees, if the request for reinstatement was made to the board within ninety days after discharge from the armed forces. Any licensee requesting reinstatement must accompany such request with a copy of his or her discharge from the armed forces.

Laws 1971, LB 1020, § 16;

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 88.